Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 4 Attendance and Leave
21-4-302. Officers — Leave of absence granted to perform active military service.

Subject to the provisions of this subchapter, the following officers shall be granted leave of absence from their respective offices and duties to perform active military service:

State officials;

County officials;

County school officials;

Municipal officials;

Township officials; and

All others who hold an elected office under the government of the State of Arkansas.

When an officer volunteers or is called into active duty in the United States Armed Forces during war, the Governor, or person or persons whose duty it is to fill the vacancy should there be one, shall, upon application being made by the officer, grant the officer a leave of absence during the time the officer is retained in the military service, subject to the exceptions provided in this subchapter.

An officer who volunteers or is called into active duty in the United States Armed Forces shall not be deemed to have forfeited his or her office during his or her leave of absence for military duty.

Upon completion of active military duty, the officer shall be permitted to resume his or her office for the remainder of the term for which he or she was elected.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment rearranged and redesignated the provisions of (a); added (c); and made minor stylistic changes.

Such officer shall file a certificate with the county clerk stating that he or she is taking a leave of absence under the provisions of this subchapter and shall name in the certificate the deputy selected by him or her to fill the office while he or she is on leave.

The county clerk shall record the certificate in the records of the county court.

The deputy so appointed shall have the right to appoint any deputies necessary for the efficient operation of the office.

Any deputy qualifying under the provisions of this subchapter shall perform all duties that may devolve upon the officer appointing him or her, and shall sign all official papers and documents in the name of the officer so appointing him or her as deputy.

The deputy's acts shall in all respects be as binding as if performed by the officer appointing such deputy.

After it is determined that the person so selected is not qualified, the Governor shall make a statement in writing setting out his or her specific objections to the person selected, and the officer applying for a leave shall certify the selection of a person who is found to be qualified before the leave of absence may be granted.

However, if the officer fails or refuses to appoint or select a person qualified, the Governor, or person who would have the authority to appoint a qualified person to fill the office during the leave, shall make such appointment.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning military leave of absence for chancery court judges, was repealed by Acts 2003, No. 1185, § 258. The section was derived from Acts 1943, No. 247, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2307.

This section amended the previous civil service act and was retroactive, so that city ordinance of 1942 providing for retention of civil service status of all municipal employees while in the armed services was valid. Smith v. Little Rock Civil Serv. Comm'n, 214 Ark. 765, 218 S.W.2d 366 (1949).

Policeman who was at head of list when he entered service was entitled to be restored to position on list on return from service, as court must consider federal, state, and municipal legislation in passing on rights of public employee as returning serviceman. Smith v. Little Rock Civil Serv. Comm'n, 214 Ark. 765, 218 S.W.2d 366 (1949).

This section undertook to preserve status of both public officers and public employees who entered the armed services. Smith v. Little Rock Civil Serv. Comm'n, 214 Ark. 765, 218 S.W.2d 366 (1949).

Where city ordinance provided that all appointments to municipal grades were to be considered temporary until six months after termination of emergency by the President of the United States, all appointments would still be temporary until such declaration by the President although hostilities had ceased, but court could not require new examinations for permanent positions until the city council set up machinery for procedure. Smith v. Little Rock Civil Serv. Comm'n, 214 Ark. 765, 218 S.W.2d 366 (1949).

Cross References. Death benefits for public employees, §21-5-701 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1967, No. 97, § 6: Feb. 15, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that employees of the State of Arkansas die from time to time leaving surviving spouses and/or minor children, who are desperately in need of financial assistance, when such employee has accumulated unused vacation time for which there is presently no legal authority to pay sums equitably due and that this Act is immediately necessary to authorize the payment of the same. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 692, § 6: Mar. 22, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that this Act will allow the estate of a deceased state employee to receive payment for unused annual leave and holidays accrued to the deceased (not to exceed sixty (60) days) at the time of death; that some families of deceased state employees will receive benefits under this Act; and that this Act should go into effect immediately in order to provide those benefits as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

History.

Acts 1943, No. 247, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2302, 12-2303; Acts 2009, No. 775, § 1.

21-4-303. Officers — Deputy appointed by officer.

Officers who are authorized by law to appoint deputies shall appoint capable and competent deputies to take over and perform the duties of the office while the officers are on leave.

The deputy shall be required to furnish good and sufficient bond in the same sum as required of the officer appointing him or her for the faithful performance of such duties.

After the bond is furnished by the deputy, the bond of the officer appointing him or her shall be null and void.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 247, §§ 5, 6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2305, 12-2306.

21-4-304. Officers — Deputy appointed by Governor.

(1)Any elected officer who is not authorized by law to appoint deputies to perform the duties of the office which he or she holds, except circuit judges and members of the General Assembly, shall select a competent and qualified person to perform the duties of the office during the time the officer is on leave and certify to the Governor, or the person or persons who would be authorized to fill a vacancy if one should occur in the office, the selection of such person.

The Governor shall confirm the selection by appointment unless he or she shall determine that the person is unfit and not qualified to fill the office.

When the officer terminates his or her military service and appears and offers to resume the duties of his or her office, the person appointed to fill the office shall relinquish the same to him or her.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 247, §§ 9, 11; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2309, 12-2311.

21-4-305. [Repealed.]

Whenever a judge of a circuit court shall volunteer or be called into the military service of the United States, the office shall be filled during such leave of absence by the election of an emergency circuit judge by a majority of all regular licensed and practicing attorneys of the judicial district in attendance at a meeting to be called by the circuit judge, after due notice to the attorneys.

The emergency circuit judge shall hold and discharge the duties of the office until such time as the regularly elected circuit judge shall reassume the office and shall be vested with all the powers and charged with all the duties incident to the office.

The emergency circuit judge shall be compensated in the same manner and amount as provided by law to the regularly elected circuit judge holding such office.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 247, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2308.

21-4-307. Officers — Expiration of term while on leave.

In the event the term of office of an official on leave shall expire during leave, the office of that official shall be filled by election or appointment as may be required by law.

However, the official on leave shall have the right to qualify and become a candidate for such office, and if nominated and elected, shall have the same rights and privileges provided in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 247, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2304.

21-4-308. Employees — Leave of absence granted at discretion of employer.

In the discretion of their employer, all employees of the state, counties, municipalities, or political subdivisions of Arkansas may be granted leave of absence under the terms of this subchapter and upon leave of absence’s being granted to officials under this subchapter.

However, an employee shall not have the right to select or in any way control the selection of his or her successor.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 247, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2312.

21-4-309. Employees — Reemployment rights.

Any public employee who may be granted a leave of absence under the provisions of this subchapter and who serves for not more than four (4) years, plus any period of additional service imposed pursuant to law shall be entitled, upon release from service under honorable conditions, to reemployment rights as provided by federal law.

The refusal of any state, county, or municipal official to comply therewith shall subject the official to removal from office.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 247, § 13; 1955, No. 72, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2313.

21-4-310. Employment and retirement rights.

During a leave of absence, an official shall be entitled to preserve all seniority rights, efficiency rating, promotional status, and retirement privileges.

The period of active military service shall, for purposes of computations to determine whether such persons may be entitled to retirement under the laws of the State of Arkansas, be deemed continuous service in the office of the official or employee.

While absent on leave, the official or employee shall not be required to make contribution to any retirement fund.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 247, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2310.

21-4-311. Vacancy in office or position.

Should any person appointed to fill the office or perform the duties of an employee to whom a leave of absence has been granted die, resign, or in any manner or for any cause vacate the office or position to which he or she was appointed, the Governor, or person whose duty it would be to fill the office or position if a vacancy should occur, shall select and appoint a capable and competent person to perform the duties of the office or position until the term of office or employment expires or until the official or employee appears for the purpose of resuming the office or position.

The appointment shall expire and terminate upon either the expiration of the term of office or employment or appearance of the official or employee for the purpose of the resumption of his or her duties.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 247, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2315.

21-4-312. Compensation of absentee and deputy or substitute.

The deputies or other persons appointed to fill the office or position of the official or employee during a leave of absence under the provisions of this subchapter shall receive the same compensation and shall be paid in the same manner as the official or employee whose duties he or she assumes.

During the time any official or employee is absent from his or her office or position on a leave of absence granted under the provisions of this subchapter, he or she shall not be entitled to compensation.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 247, §§ 14, 15; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2314, 12-2315.

21-4-313. Commission, oath of deputy, or substitute.

It shall not be required that a commission issue to any person appointed to fill any office or position of one who has been granted a leave of absence under the provisions of this subchapter.

Every person so appointed shall be required to take and subscribe to the same oath as the officer or employer was required to take before he or she entered upon the performance of the duties of the office or position.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 247, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2316.

Subchapter 4

— Deceased Employees — Payment for Accrued Leave

21-4-401. Specific repeal required.

This subchapter shall remain in full force and effect in the event that subsequent legislation relative to vacations is enacted, unless it is specifically repealed.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 97, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2346.

21-4-402. Payment for accrued vacation.

It shall be the duty of the officer in charge of each agency, department, commission, or board of the State of Arkansas, immediately upon the death of any employee thereof, to cause to be ascertained the number of days of vacation which have accrued and which have not been taken by such employee and to cause the preparation of a voucher or other document which shall direct the payment of a sum which is determined by multiplying the number of unused accrued vacation days by the daily rate of pay which was being paid to such deceased employee as of the date of his or her death.

The Auditor of State or other authorized disbursing officer of any agency, department, commission, or board shall prepare a check, draft, or other negotiable instrument made payable to the estate of the decedent.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (b)(1) and (2).

History.

Acts 1967, No. 97, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2343.

21-4-403. Determination of amount of leave and rate of pay — Records.

In the event that the salary of a deceased employee is not fixed on the basis of a day, then the daily rate of pay shall be determined by dividing the monthly salary by thirty (30) or the annual salary by three hundred sixty (360), as the case may be.

(1)The number of days of accumulated leave of any deceased employee shall be determined on the basis of the written rules, resolutions, or policies promulgated by the agency or department head or by the board or commission.

Each agency, department head, board, or commission shall keep complete records of the vacations taken and accrued vacation time as provided by its rules, resolutions, or policies.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 97, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2344, 12-2345; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2319.

21-4-404. Payment for unused annual leave and holidays.

When a person dies while actively employed by any agency of the State of Arkansas, the deceased's estate or the person entitled to receive payment shall receive payment from the state agency for all unused annual leave and holidays which had accrued to the deceased at the time of death, except that the total shall not exceed sixty (60) days.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 692, § 1.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1991, No. 692, § 2, provided:

“The provisions of this Act shall apply to not only Department of Correction employees who die after March 22, 1991, but also to those persons who died prior to March 22, 1991 but subsequent to January 1, 1990 and who were actively employed by the Arkansas Department of Correction on the date of death.”

21-4-405. Payment of accrued leave to estate of wildlife officer.

The Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission may pay all accrued and unused annual, holiday, and sick leave to the estate of a wildlife officer who dies in the line of duty.

A payment under subsection (a) of this section is subject to budgetary constraints and shall be disbursed after receipt of the official death certificate.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2016, No. 83, § 13, provided: “PAYMENT OF ACCRUED LEAVE.

The Arkansas Game and Fish Commission is hereby authorized to pay all accrued and unused annual, holiday, and sick leave to the estate of any wildlife officer who dies in the line of duty. Such payments are subject to budgetary constraints and shall be disbursed after receipt of the official death certificate.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 1999, No. 1127, § 8: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this act should become effective at the beginning of the next fiscal year; that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not go into effect until after the beginning of the next fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2007, No. 447, § 2: Mar. 22, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that some retiring classified and nonclassified employees of two-year colleges have not received the benefits intended by the prior law; that this act clarifies the eligibility of all classified and nonclassified employees for these benefits; and that this act is immediately necessary to preserve that eligibility for those employees of two-year colleges making retirement decisions before the end of the current semester. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 220, §3: Feb. 25, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that some retiring classified and nonclassified employees of two-year colleges have not received the benefits intended by prior law; that this act clarifies the eligibility of nonclassified employees for these benefits; and that this act is immediately necessary to preserve that eligibility for those nonclassified employees of two-year colleges making retirement decisions before the end of the current semester. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 337 § 2: Mar. 18, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that some nonclassified employees who have retired from state-supported institutions of higher education have not received the benefits intended under current law due to unclear language; that clarification of the eligibility of nonclassified employees to receive unused sick leave benefits is needed; and that this act is immediately necessary for nonclassified employees of state-supported institutions of higher education to make retirement decisions for the end of the current academic semester. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

If the employee has accumulated at least fifty (50) days but fewer than sixty (60) days of sick leave, the employee shall receive an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of the number of accrued sick leave days rounded to the nearest day multiplied by fifty percent (50%) of the employee's daily salary;

If the employee has accumulated at least sixty (60) days but fewer than seventy (70) days of sick leave, the employee shall receive an amount equal to sixty percent (60%) of the number of accrued sick leave days rounded to the nearest day multiplied by sixty percent (60%) of the employee's daily salary;

If the employee has accumulated at least seventy (70) days but fewer than eighty (80) days of sick leave, the employee shall receive an amount equal to seventy percent (70%) of the number of accrued sick days rounded to the nearest day multiplied by seventy percent (70%) of the employee's daily salary; and

If the employee has accumulated at least eighty (80) or more days of sick leave, the employee shall receive an amount equal to eighty percent (80%) of the number of accrued sick leave days rounded to the nearest day multiplied by eighty percent (80%) of the employee's daily salary.

The Office of Personnel Management shall promulgate rules necessary to implement this subchapter.

In no event shall an employee or beneficiary of an employee receive an amount that exceeds seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) upon retirement or death due to the provisions of this section.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment, in the introductory language of (a), inserted “or death” and “or beneficiary of any employee”; substituted “multiplied by” for “times” in (a)(1), (2), (3), and (4); and, in (d), inserted “or beneficiary of any employee” and “or death.”

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning lump sum payment for unused sick leave in 2000, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 97. The section was derived from Acts 1999, No. 1127, § 2.

Employees of the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission;

Employees of the Arkansas Department of Transportation;

Classified employees of state-supported institutions of higher education; and

Employees of all agencies of this state whether in the executive, legislative, or judicial branch of government.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment inserted the subdivision (a) designation; in present (a), inserted “classified employees of state-supported institutions of higher learning” and deleted “except that this subchapter does not apply to state supported institutions of higher learning” from the end; and added (b) and (c).

The 2009 amendment, in (a), redesignated the text, substituted “§21-4-501 and §21-4-504” for “this subchapter” in the introductory language, substituted “education” for “learning” in (a)(3), and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (a)(2).

History.

Acts 2015, No. 552, § 1.

21-4-406. Payment of accrued leave to estate of Arkansas Highway Police Division officer.

The State Highway Commission may pay all accrued and unused annual, holiday, and sick leave to the estate of an officer of the Arkansas Highway Police Division of the Arkansas Department of Transportation who dies in the line of duty.

A payment under subsection (a) of this section is subject to budgetary constraints and shall be disbursed after receipt of the official death certificate.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 552, § 1; 2017, No. 707, §
69.

Subchapter 5

— Financial Incentives to Decrease Use of Sick Leave

21-4-501. Compensation for unused sick leave at retirement.

Upon retirement or death, any employee or beneficiary of any employee of any agency of the State of Arkansas shall receive compensation for accumulated unused sick leave as follows:

For purposes of this section, the employee's daily salary shall be determined by dividing the annual salary by two hundred sixty (260).

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1127, § 1; 2001, No. 991, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 2320.

21-4-502. [Repealed.]

The provisions of §§21-4-501 and21-4-504 apply to:

The provisions of this section or any amendments to this section shall not change any employee benefits or agreements established under §6-57-103, §6-58-105, or §6-59-105.

Compensation for accumulated unused sick leave under the provisions of this subchapter shall not be used by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System in the calculation of final average salary pursuant to §24-7-202.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1127, § 3; 2005, No. 1288, § 1; 2009, No. 220, § 1; 2017, No. 707, §
70.

21-4-504. Participation by other state agencies.

All state agencies are encouraged to participate in the Department of Finance and Administration's state leave accounting system.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1127, § 4.